Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 5
FIREFIGHTER BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
BENEFITS PROGRAM

29-5-501. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Employer" means a municipality, special district, fire authority, or county improvement district that employs one or more firefighters. "Employer" also means the division of fire prevention and control created in section 24-33.5-1201. "Employer" does not include a power authority created pursuant to section 29-1-204 or a municipally owned utility.

"Firefighter" means a full- or part-time employee of an employer whose duties are directly involved with the provision of fire protection services and a volunteer firefighter as defined in section 31-30-1102. "Firefighter" includes a person meeting this definition who provides volunteer services to a fire authority created by an intergovernmental agreement providing fire protection.

"Trust" means a multiple employer behavioral health trust described in section 10-3-903.5 (7)(e), established for the purposes of this part 5.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-002), ch. 339, p. 2440, § 4, effective June 3.

29-5-502. Required program - reimbursement.

An employer shall participate in a multiple employer behavioral health trust in order to provide the program specified in this section for its firefighters. If at any time the funding provided pursuant to subsection (3) of this section is insufficient to cover the cost of the program required by this section, then the requirement to participate in the program becomes optional pursuant to section 29-1-304.5.

A trust shall provide a program planned, organized, operated, and maintained to provide basic services to firefighters for the prevention, diagnosis, and initial treatment of emotional, behavioral, or mental health disorders. Services provided under the program shall be rendered primarily on an outpatient and consultative basis, including services delivered telephonically or remotely.

Subject to available appropriations and the requirements of section 24-33.5-1231 (2)(a)(II), the division of fire prevention and control shall reimburse a multiple employer behavioral health trust for the direct costs of providing a program as required by this part 5 from the local firefighter safety and disease prevention fund created in section 24-33.5-1231 (1).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-002), ch. 339, p. 2441, § 4, effective June 3.

29-5-503. Authority of the trust - rules - report.

In addition to any other authority given to the trust, the trust has the authority to:

Create a program description to further define the services available pursuant to this part 5;

Structure the services provided under the program based on actuarial recommendations and with input from a committee of the trust consisting of representatives of labor, management, administration, and employers serving different sized populations; and

Adopt policies and procedures for the administration of the trust.

On or before October 1, 2024, the trust, together with the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety, shall submit a report to the wildfire matters review committee on the implementation of this part 5. The report must, at a minimum:

Discuss the extent to which the program provided under this part 5 is meeting the behavioral health-care needs of firefighters in the state;

Assess the ongoing funding needs of the trust and whether the available funding is sufficient to allow the trust to meet the behavioral health-care needs of firefighters; and

Recommend any changes needed to more effectively meet the behavioral health-care needs of firefighters across the state.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-002), ch. 339, p. 2441, § 4, effective June 3.